Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1348.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 751(a.2), (a.3), (b.1) and (g) and 807.1(a.2), (a.3) and (e) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 751. Work to be Done Under Contract Let on Bids; Exception.--(a.2) (1) All construction, reconstruction, repairs, maintenance or work of any nature, including the introduction of plumbing, heating and ventilating, or lighting systems, upon any school building or upon any school property, or upon any building or portion of a building leased under the provisions of section 703.1, made by any school district where 123456789101112131415161718192021 the entire cost, value or amount of such construction, reconstruction, repairs, maintenance or work, including labor and material, shall exceed a base amount of eighteen thousand five hundred dollars ($18,500), subject to adjustment under section 120, shall be done under separate contracts to be entered into by such school district with the lowest responsible bidder, upon proper terms, after due public notice has been given asking for competitive bids. Whenever a board of school directors shall approve the use of a prefabricated unit, complete in itself, for a school building or other proper structure to be erected upon school property, the board of school directors may have prepared appropriate specifications detailing the size and material desired in a particular prefabricated unit, including all utilities such as plumbing, heating and ventilating, and electrical work, and may advertise for a single bid on all the work and award the contract therefor to the lowest responsible bidder: Provided, That, if due to an emergency a school plant or any part thereof becomes unusable, competitive bids for repairs or replacement may be solicited from at least three responsible bidders, and, upon the approval of any of these bids by the board of school directors, the school district may proceed at once to make the necessary repairs or replacements in accordance with the terms of said approved bid or bids; and Provided further, That the school district shall notify the Secretary of Education in a form and manner determined by the Secretary of Education that an emergency has occurred and a bid has been selected under the emergency process provided for in this section.(2) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year and for each school year thereafter, the competitive bids required by 20260SB1348PN1745 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraph (1) shall only be required if the entire cost, value or amount of the construction, reconstruction, repairs, maintenance or work, including labor and material, exceeds a base amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), subject to adjustment under section 120.(a.3) Written or telephonic price quotations from at least three qualified and responsible contractors shall be requested by the board of school directors for all contracts that exceed a base amount of [ten thousand dollars ($10,000),] fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), subject to adjustment under section 120, but are less than the amount requiring advertisement and competitive bidding, or, in lieu of price quotations, a memorandum shall be kept on file showing that fewer than three qualified contractors exist in the market area within which it is practicable to obtain quotations. A written record of telephonic price quotations shall be made and shall contain at least the date of the quotation, the name of the contractor and the contractor's representative, the construction, reconstruction, repair, maintenance or work which was the subject of the quotation and the price. Written price quotations, written records of telephonic price quotations and memoranda shall be retained for a period of three years.(b.1) The board of school directors in any school district may perform any construction, reconstruction, repairs, or work of any nature where the entire cost or value, including labor and material, is less than a base amount of [ten thousand dollars ($10,000),] fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), subject to adjustment under section 120, by its own maintenance personnel. The board of school directors in any school district may authorize the secretary of the board or other executive to award 20260SB1348PN1745 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contracts for construction, reconstruction, repairs, or work of any nature, where the entire cost or value, including labor and material, subject to adjustment under section 120, is a base amount of [eighteen thousand five hundred dollars ($18,500)] one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or less, without soliciting competitive bids, subject, however, to the provisions of subsection (a.3).* * *(g) No board of school directors shall evade the provisions of this section as to advertising for bids or purchasing materials or contracting for services piecemeal for the purpose of obtaining prices under a base amount of [eighteen thousand five hundred dollars ($18,500),] one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), subject to adjustment under section 120, upon transactions which should, in the exercise of reasonable discretion and prudence, be conducted as one transaction amounting to more than a base amount of [eighteen thousand five hundred dollars ($18,500),] one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), subject to adjustment under section 120. This provision is intended to make unlawful the practice of evading advertising requirements by making a series of purchases or contracts each for less than the advertising requirement price, or by making several simultaneous purchases or contracts each below said price, when in either case the transaction involved should have been made as one transaction for one price.Section 807.1. Purchase of Supplies.--(a.2) All furniture, equipment, textbooks, school supplies and other appliances for the use of the public schools costing, subject to adjustment under section 120, a base amount of [eighteen thousand five hundred dollars ($18,500)] one hundred 20260SB1348PN1745 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 thousand dollars ($100,000) or more shall be purchased by the board of school directors only after due advertisement as hereinafter provided. Supplies costing, subject to adjustment under section 120, a base amount of [eighteen thousand five hundred dollars ($18,500)] one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more shall be purchased by the board of school directors only after public notice has been given by advertisement once a week for three (3) weeks in not less than two (2) newspapers of general circulation. In any district where no newspaper is published, said notice may, in lieu of such publication, be posted in at least five (5) public places.(a.3) Written or telephonic price quotations from at least three (3) qualified and responsible vendors shall be requested by the board of school directors for all purchases of supplies that exceed a base amount of [ten thousand dollars ($10,000),] fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), subject to adjustment under section 120, but are less than the amount requiring advertisement and competitive bidding, or, in lieu of price quotations, a memorandum shall be kept on file showing that fewer than three (3) qualified vendors exist in the market area within which it is practicable to obtain quotations. A written record of telephonic price quotations shall be made and shall contain at least the date of the quotation, the name of the vendor and the vendor's representative, the supplies which were the subject of the quotation and the price of the supplies. Written price quotations, written records of telephonic price quotations and memoranda shall be retained for a period of three years.* * *(e) No board of school directors shall evade the provisions 20260SB1348PN1745 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this section as to advertising for bids or purchasing materials piecemeal for the purpose of obtaining prices under the base amount of [eighteen thousand five hundred dollars ($18,500),] one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), subject to adjustment under section 120, upon transactions which should, in the exercise of reasonable discretion and prudence, be conducted as one transaction amounting to more than a base amount of [eighteen thousand five hundred dollars ($18,500),] one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), subject to adjustment under section 120. This provision is intended to make unlawful the practice of evading advertising requirements by making a series of purchases or contracts each for less than the advertising requirement price, or by making several simultaneous purchases or contracts each below said price, when in either case the transaction involved should have been made as one transaction for one price.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1348PN1745 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516